Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [617.263] NONCONSENSUAL CREATION OR DISSEMINATION OF NUDIFICATION IMAGES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Dissemination" means distribution to one or more persons, other than the individual depicted in the nudification image, or publication by any publicly available medium. new text end new text begin (c) "Intimate parts" has the meaning given in section 609.341, subdivision 5. new text end new text begin (d) "Nudification image" means an image, photograph, video, or visual recording that is the resulting product of nudification and includes an image that depicts the identifiable individual as nude or exposing intimate parts, or engaging in a sexual act, when the source material did not depict the individual in that state. new text end new text begin (e) "Nudification" means the process by which: new text end new text begin (1) an image or video is altered or generated to depict an intimate part not depicted in an original unaltered image or video of an identifiable individual; and new text end new text begin (2) the altered or generated image or video is so realistic that a reasonable person would believe that the intimate part belongs to the identifiable individual. new text end new text begin (f) "Personal information" means any identifier that permits communication or in-person contact with an individual, including: new text end new text begin (1) an individual's first and last name, first initial and last name, first name and last initial, or nickname; new text end new text begin (2) an individual's home, school, or work address; new text end new text begin (3) an individual's telephone number, email address, or social media account information; or new text end new text begin (4) an individual's geolocation data. new text end new text begin (g) "Sexual act" means either sexual contact or sexual penetration as defined in section 617.261, subdivision 7. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin Whoever intentionally creates or disseminates a nudification image is guilty of a crime and must be sentenced under subdivision 3 when: new text end new text begin (1) the actor knows or reasonably should know that the depicted individual did not consent to the creation or dissemination; and new text end new text begin (2) the depicted individual is identifiable: new text end new text begin (i) from the nudification image itself, by the depicted individual or by another individual; or new text end new text begin (ii) from the personal information displayed in connection with the nudification image. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) Whoever violates subdivision 2 is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. If one or more of the following aggravating factors are present, the person may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than ten years or to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000, or both: new text end new text begin (1) the depicted individual suffers financial loss due to the creation or dissemination of the nudification image; new text end new text begin (2) the actor creates or disseminates the nudification image with intent to profit; new text end new text begin (3) the actor maintains an Internet website, online service, online application, or mobile application for the purpose of creating or disseminating nudification images; new text end new text begin (4) the actor posts the nudification image on a website; new text end new text begin (5) the actor creates or disseminates the nudification image with intent to harass the depicted individual; new text end new text begin (6) the actor obtained the source material for the nudification image by committing a violation of section 609.52, 609.746, 609.89, or 609.891; or new text end new text begin (7) the actor has previously been convicted under this section or section 617.261 or 617.262. new text end new text begin (b) As soon as is practicable, the Minnesota Sentencing Guidelines Commission must assign an appropriate severity level ranking consistent with offenses of similar gravity, such as nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images under section 617.261, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), taking into the consideration the nonconsensual nature, technological manipulation, and potential for widespread harm. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin No defense. new text end new text begin It is not a defense to a prosecution for a violation of subdivision 2 that the individual depicted in the nudification image consented to the voluntary private transmission of the nudification image. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Venue. new text end new text begin An offense committed under this section may be prosecuted in the county where the offense occurred, the county of residence of the actor or the depicted individual, or the county where the nudification image was produced, reproduced, found, stored, received, or possessed. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Exemptions. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to the use of nudification images for purposes of: new text end new text begin (1) a lawful criminal investigation or prosecution; new text end new text begin (2) the reporting of unlawful conduct; new text end new text begin (3) medical or mental health treatment where the image is protected from further dissemination; new text end new text begin (4) a commercial setting where the depicted individual knew or reasonably should have known that a nudification image would be created and disseminated; new text end new text begin (5) a matter of public interest that serves a lawful public purpose, provided the person clearly identifies the image as a nudification image and acts in good faith; new text end new text begin (6) legitimate scientific research or educational purposes, provided the image is clearly identified and the person acts in good faith to minimize further dissemination; or new text end new text begin (7) legal proceedings consistent with common practice or protected by court order. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Immunity. new text end new text begin No interactive computer service, public mobile service, private radio service, telecommunications network, or broadband provider is criminally liable under this section for content provided by another person. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end